Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 1. Licensing.

Sec. 21.27.010.
License required.

Except as provided otherwise in this chapter, a person may not act as or represent to be an insurance producer, managing general agent, reinsurance intermediary broker, reinsurance intermediary manager, surplus lines broker, or independent adjuster in this state or relative to a subject resident, located, or to be performed in this state unless licensed under this chapter. A person may not act as or represent to be a managing general agent, reinsurance intermediary broker, or reinsurance intermediary manager representing an insurer domiciled in this state regarding a risk located outside this state unless licensed by this state.

An insurance producer, a managing general agent, a reinsurance intermediary broker, a reinsurance intermediary manager, or a surplus lines broker may not solicit or take applications for, procure, place for others, or otherwise transact business for a kind or class of insurance for which the person is not licensed.

A third-party administrator is not required to be licensed as a managing general agent if the third-party administrator

is registered under AS

21.27.630

—

21.27.660

; or

only investigates and adjusts claims and is licensed under this chapter as an independent adjuster.

A licensee may not use a fictitious name or alias unless the licensee’s legal name and fictitious name or alias are on the license.

An employee of an insurer who responds to requests from existing policyholders on existing policies is not required to be licensed under this section if the employee

is not directly compensated based on volume of premiums that may result from those services; and

does not transact insurance.

A person who performs management services under a written contract for an admitted insurer is not required to be licensed as a managing general agent if

either

the person is a United States manager of the United States branch of an alien admitted insurer; or

the person’s compensation is not based on the volume of premium written; and

the person

is a wholly-owned subsidiary of the admitted insurer;

wholly owns the admitted insurer; or

is a wholly-owned subsidiary of the insurance holding company subject to AS 21.22 that owns or controls the admitted insurer.

A person who performs management services for an admitted reinsurer is not required to be licensed as a reinsurance intermediary manager if

the person’s compensation is not based on the volume of premium written and the person

is a wholly-owned subsidiary of the admitted insurer;

wholly owns the admitted insurer; or

is a wholly-owned subsidiary of an insurance holding company subject to AS 21.22 that owns or controls the admitted insurer;

the person is a United States manager of the United States branch of an alien admitted insurer; or

the person is the manager of a group, association, pool, or organization of insurers that does joint underwriting and that is subject to examination by its resident insurance regulator in a state that

the director has determined has enacted provisions substantially similar to those contained in this chapter; and

is accredited by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

This chapter does not apply to a person

licensed to practice as an attorney at law while the person is acting as an attorney at law; or

who sells, solicits, or negotiates a

service contract on a motor vehicle subject to registration under AS

28.10.011

; or

home warranty; in this subparagraph, “home warranty” has the meaning given in AS

21.03.021(e)(2)(C)

.

A person licensed under AS 21.75 as an attorney-in-fact, or a person who meets the requirements for exemption from licensure under AS 21.75, is not required to be additionally licensed under this chapter while acting on behalf of subscribers and within the scope and authority of a subscribers agreement of a reciprocal insurer or exchange licensed under AS 21.75.

This section does not apply to a person who

is employed on salary or hourly wage by a person licensed under this section solely for the performance of accounting, clerical, stenographic, and similar office duties;

only secures and forwards information required for the purposes of, and does not receive a commission for, any of the following services:

performing administrative services related to

group life insurance;

group property and casualty insurance;

group annuities;

group or blanket accident and health insurance;

enrolling individuals under plans for the types of insurance or annuities specified in (A) of this paragraph;

issuing certificates under plans for the types of insurance or annuities specified in (A) of this paragraph, or otherwise assisting in administering those plans;

performing administrative services related to mass-marketed property and casualty insurance;

is employed on salary by a licensee at the licensee’s place of business, is supervised by and reports directly to a licensee in the firm, and who, after explaining that the matter must be reviewed by a licensee, may

furnish premium estimates from published or printed lists of standard rates if the person does not advise, counsel, or suggest what coverage may be needed, or otherwise solicit insurance coverage;

arrange appointments for a licensee if the person does not solicit insurance coverage;

record information from an applicant or policyholder and complete for the licensee’s personal review and signature, a certificate of insurance that is not a contract of insurance; the licensee’s signature may be by facsimile;

inform a policyholder of the type of coverage shown in the licensee’s policy record if the person does not advise that an event or hypothetical event is or is not covered; or

in the physical presence of the licensee, record information from an applicant or policyholder and complete for a licensee’s personal review and personal signature, applications, binders, endorsements, or identification cards if the person discloses to the applicant or policyholder that the applicant or policyholder may review the matter with a licensee;

is an employee of an insurer or an organization employed by an insurer and is engaged in the inspection, rating, or classification of risks, or in the supervision of the training of insurance producers and is not individually engaged in the sale, solicitation, or negotiation of insurance;

advertises in this state through printed publications or electronic mass media, the distribution of which is not limited to residents of this state, if the person

performs no other insurance-related activities in this state;

does not intend to solicit in this state; and

does not sell, solicit, or negotiate insurance of risks resident, located, or to be performed in this state;

is not a resident of this state, but sells, solicits, or negotiates commercial property and casualty insurance for an insured with risks located in more than one state if the person is licensed as an insurance producer in the state where the insured maintains its principal place of business and the contract of insurance covers risks located in that state;

is a salaried full-time employee who counsels or advises the person’s employer regarding the insurance interests of the employer or of the subsidiaries or business affiliates of the employer, if the employee does not sell or solicit insurance or receive a commission from the sale or solicitation of insurance;

is an employer or association or the employer’s or association’s officer, director, employee, or the trustee of an employee trust plan, if the person is not compensated, directly or indirectly, for transacting insurance and is engaged in the administration or operation of a plan offering employee benefits for the employer’s or association’s own employees, or the employees of its subsidiaries or affiliates; to qualify under this paragraph, the plan must include insurance for employees;

is an officer, director, or employee of an admitted insurer who does not receive a commission on policies written or sold to risks resident, located, or to be performed in this state if the officer’s, director’s, or employee’s functions are executive, administrative, managerial, clerical, or a combination of these and are only indirectly related to the transaction of insurance; relate to underwriting or loss control; or are in the capacity of an agency supervisor where the activities are limited to providing technical assistance to insurance producers and whose activities do not include transacting insurance;

is an employee of a licensed independent adjuster or an employee of an affiliate of a licensed independent adjuster with not more than 25 people under the supervision of one licensed independent adjuster or licensed producer who collects or furnishes claim information for portable electronics insurance issued under AS

21.36.515

to insureds or claimants and enters the information into an automated claims adjudication system; the automated claims adjudication system must be a preprogrammed computer system designed for the collection, data entry, calculation, and final resolution of portable electronics insurance claims that

may be used only by a licensed independent adjuster, licensed agent, or supervised individuals operating under this section;

must comply with the claims payment requirements of this title; and

must be certified as compliant with this paragraph by a licensed independent adjuster that is an officer of a licensed entity under this chapter.

In addition to the business activities expressly exempt from licensing under this section, the director may adopt regulations that exempt other activities from the licensing requirements of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 4 ch 149 SLA 1984; am §§ 1, 2 ch 51 SLA 1990; am § 50 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 36 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 15 ch 56 SLA 1996; am §§ 19, 20 ch 81 SLA 1997; am §§ 10, 11 ch 81 SLA 2001; am § 2 ch 143 SLA 2003; am § 7 ch 1 FSSLA 2005; am § 3 ch 78 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 103 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For bail bonds, see 3 AAC 23, art. 5.

For group-marketed property and casualty insurance, see 3 AAC 29, art. 3.

For assigned risk pool, see 3 AAC 30, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, in (h)(2)(B), substituted “AS

21.03.021(e)(2)(C)

” for “AS

21.03.021(e)(2)(D)

”.

The second 2014 amendment, effective October 26, 2014, added (j)(10) and made a related change.

Sec. 21.27.020.
General qualifications for license.

For the protection of the people of this state, the director may not issue or renew a license except in compliance with this chapter and may not issue a license to a person, or to be exercised by a person, found by the director to be untrustworthy, incompetent, or who has not established to the satisfaction of the director that the person is qualified under this chapter.

To qualify for issuance or renewal of an individual license, an applicant or licensee shall comply with this title and regulations adopted under AS

21.06.090

and

shall be 18 years of age or older;

if for a resident license, shall be a bona fide resident before issuance of the license and actually reside in the state;

shall successfully pass an examination required under AS

21.27.060

;

shall be a trustworthy person;

may not use or intend to use the license for the purpose principally of writing controlled business, as defined in AS

21.27.030

;

may not have committed an act that is a cause for denial, nonrenewal, suspension, or revocation of a license in this state or another jurisdiction.

To qualify for issuance or renewal of a license as a firm insurance producer, a firm managing general agent, a firm reinsurance intermediary broker, a firm reinsurance intermediary manager, a firm surplus lines broker, or a firm independent adjuster, an applicant or licensee shall

comply with (b)(4) and (5) of this section;

maintain a lawfully established place of business in this state, except when licensed as a nonresident under AS

21.27.270

;

designate one or more compliance officers for the firm, except that not more than one compliance officer may be designated for each class of authority;

provide to the director documents necessary to verify the information contained in or made in connection with the application; and

notify the director, in writing, not later than 30 days after a change in the firm’s compliance officer.

If the director finds that the applicant or licensee is qualified and that application, license, or renewal fees have been paid, the director may issue or renew the license.

[Repealed, § 94(a) ch 23 SLA 2011.]

The director may adopt regulations establishing additional education or experience requirements for applicants, licensees, and continuing education providers under this chapter upon due consideration of the availability and accessibility of education and training opportunities in rural areas of the state. Regulations adopted under this subsection are subject to the following provisions:

additional educational or experience requirements may not apply to a licensee who has been licensed by the division of insurance before January 1, 1980;

a licensee shall complete at least 24 credit hours of approved continuing education courses during each two-year license period;

if a licensee has accumulated more credit hours than required under (2) of this subsection by the end of the license period, a maximum of eight hours may be carried over to meet the requirements of (2) of this subsection in the next license period;

a program or seminar may not be approved as an acceptable continuing education program unless it is a formal program of learning that contributes to the professional competence of the licensee; individual study programs or correspondence courses may be used to fulfill continuing education requirements if approved by the director;

a nonresident licensee is exempt from the requirements of this subsection.

The director shall establish a continuing education advisory committee. The committee consists of one representative from the division of insurance, one life and health insurance representative, one property and casualty insurance representative, and one independent insurance adjuster representative. Each committee representative from the insurance industry must possess a valid, current insurance license issued in this state for the field to be represented.

The director may make arrangements, including contracting with an outside agency, for administrative services.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 5 ch 29 SLA 1987; am §§ 51, 52 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 37 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 16 ch 56 SLA 1996; am §§ 12 — 14 ch 81 SLA 2001; am § 20 ch 38 SLA 2002; am §§ 26, 27 ch 80 SLA 2006; am §§ 35, 36, 94(a) ch 23 SLA 2011; am §§
16, 17 ch 41 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 3 AAC 23, art. 1.

For fiduciary responsibilities of licensees, see 3 AAC 23, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 16, 2016, in (c)(3), inserted “, except that not more than one compliance officer may be designated for each class of authority” following “firm”; in (c)(5), substituted “not later than” for “within” and “after” for “of”; in (f), inserted “, and continuing education providers” following “licensees”; and made a stylistic change.

Sec. 21.27.025.
Required notice of licensee.

A licensee shall notify the director in writing not later than 30 days after a change in residence, place of business, legal name, fictitious name or alias, mailing address, electronic mailing address, telephone number, or compliance officer. A licensee shall report to the director in writing any administrative action taken against the licensee by a governmental agency of another state, by a governmental agency of another jurisdiction, or by a financial industry regulatory authority sanction or arbitration proceeding not later than 30 days after the final disposition of the action. A licensee shall submit to the director the final order and other relevant legal documents in the action. A licensee shall report to the director any criminal prosecution of the licensee in this or another state or jurisdiction not later than 30 days after the date of filing of the criminal complaint, indictment, information, or citation in the prosecution. The licensee shall submit to the director a copy of the criminal complaint, calendaring order, and other relevant legal documents in the prosecution.

In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a failure to notify the director as required by this section is cause for denial, nonrenewal, suspension, or revocation of a license.

History.

(§ 53 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 38 ch 62 SLA 1995; am §§ 15, 16 ch 81 SLA 2001; am § 37 ch 23 SLA 2011; am § 18 ch 41 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For viatical settlements, see 3 AAC 31, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 16, 2016, in (a), substituted “not later than” for “within” preceding “30 days” in two places; inserted “, or compliance officer” following “telephone number”; substituted “, or by a financial industry regulatory authority sanction or arbitration proceeding not later than” for “within” following “another jurisdiction”; and made a stylistic change.

Sec. 21.27.030.
Controlled business disqualification.

The director may not issue an insurance producer, a managing general agent, or a surplus lines broker license to a person if the director has reasonable cause to believe that the applicant for the license would, during the 12-month period immediately following issuance of the license, earn or receive an aggregate amount in commission, service fees, brokerage, or other valuable consideration, directly or indirectly, by whatever name called, represented by the controlled business that exceeds 50 percent of the aggregate amount of compensation, commission, service fees, brokerage, or other valuable consideration represented by all other insurance business that would be procured by or through the applicant.

The vendor who is title holder of property being sold under an installment purchase contract is not considered to be the owner of the property for the purposes of this section.

A licensee may not earn or receive an aggregate amount in commission, service fees, brokerage, or other valuable consideration, directly or indirectly, by whatever name called, represented by the controlled business that exceeds 50 percent of the aggregate amount in compensation, commission, service fees, brokerage, or other valuable consideration represented by all other insurance business in a calendar year.

In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a person who violates this section is subject to the penalties provided under AS

21.27.440

.

“Controlled business” means insurance procured or to be procured by or through the person upon

the life, person, or property of the person or those of the person’s spouse or relatives by blood or marriage to the second degree;

the life, person, or property of the employer or firm of the person, or of an officer, director, stockholder, or member of the employer or firm of the person, other than members of mutual insurers, or of a spouse of the employer, officer, director, stockholder, or member;

the life, person, or property of the ward or employees of the person, or upon persons or property under the person’s supervision or control as trustee under an indenture or decree, or as administrator or executor of an estate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am §§ 6, 7 ch 29 SLA 1987; am §§ 3, 4 ch 51 SLA 1990; am §§ 54 — 56 ch 67 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (b) and (c) were formerly (c) and (d); relettered in 1991. Subsection (d) enacted as (e); relettered in 1992. Subsection (e) was formerly (b); relettered as (d) in 1991 and again in 1992.

Sec. 21.27.040.
Application for license.

Application for a license shall be made to the director upon forms prescribed by the director. As a part of or in connection with the application, the applicant shall furnish information concerning the applicant’s identity, personal history, experience, business record, purposes, and other pertinent facts that the director may reasonably require. The applicant shall declare, subject to penalty of denial, nonrenewal, suspension, or revocation of a license issued by the director, that the statements made in or in connection with the application are true, correct, and complete to the best of the applicant’s knowledge and belief. Payment of an application fee established under AS

21.06.250

must be submitted with the application.

[Repealed, § 47 ch 29 SLA 1987.]

In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a person wilfully misrepresenting a fact required to be disclosed in or in connection with the application or other information required by this section is subject to the penalties provided for under AS

21.27.440

.

The director may require an applicant or licensee at any time, including at the time of license renewal, to supply current information of the type made in or supplemental to an application.

As part of the application required by (a) of this section, a resident applicant shall furnish to the director a full set of fingerprints and the fees required by the Department of Public Safety under AS

12.62.160

for criminal justice information and a national criminal history record check so that the director may obtain criminal justice information as provided under AS 12.62 about the applicant. The director shall submit the completed fingerprint card and fees to the Department of Public Safety for a report of criminal justice information under AS 12.62 and a national criminal history record check under AS

12.62.400

.

If, through inaction, an applicant fails to complete the application process, the applicant’s application filed with the director under (a) of this section is considered withdrawn. The withdrawal becomes effective 120 days after the filing of the application. If the director has initiated administrative action with respect to an application, withdrawal becomes effective at the time and on the conditions required by an order issued under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 47 ch 29 SLA 1987; am §§ 57 — 59 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 21 ch 81 SLA 1997; am §§ 17, 18 ch 81 SLA 2001; am § 15 ch 79 SLA 2004; am § 28 ch 80 SLA 2006; am § 38 ch 23 SLA 2011)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 3 AAC 23, art. 1.

For viatical settlements, see 3 AAC 31, art. 3.

Sec. 21.27.050.
One filing of personal data sufficient. [Repealed, § 223 ch 67 SLA 1992.]

Sec. 21.27.060.
Examination of applicants and licensees.

Except as provided in this chapter, an applicant for an individual license and a compliance officer applicant for a firm license shall, before the issuance of the license, personally take and pass, to the satisfaction of the director, an examination that tests the knowledge and competence of the applicant as to the applicant’s duties and responsibilities as a licensee and the insurance statutes and regulations of the state.

If the director determines that a licensee has violated this title or that a licensee has conducted affairs under the license that cause the director reasonably to desire further evidence of the qualifications of the licensee, the director may at any time require the licensee to personally take and pass, to the satisfaction of the director, an examination that tests the knowledge and competence of the licensee as to the licensee’s duties and responsibilities as a licensee, or the insurance laws of the state.

An individual who applies for an insurance producer license in this state who was previously licensed for the same lines of authority in that individual’s prior home state is not required to pass the examination required by (a) of this section in order to secure the same authority in this state. The exemption available under this subsection applies only if the application is received within 90 days after the cancellation of the applicant’s previous license in the applicant’s prior home state and

the applicant’s prior home state verifies that, at the time of cancellation, the applicant held an insurance producer license that was in good standing in that state; or

the insurance producer licensing database records for the prior home state that are maintained by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners or its affiliates or subsidiaries indicate that the applicant is or was licensed in good standing for the kind of license requested.

This section does not apply to an applicant

for a limited license under AS

21.27.150(a)(1)

, (4), (5), or (8); or

who, at any time within the one-year period immediately preceding the date the current pending application is received by the division, had been licensed in good standing in this state under a license requiring substantially similar qualifications as required by the license applied for.

The director may make available a printed manual specifying in general terms the subjects that may be covered in an examination for a particular license.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 8 ch 29 SLA 1987; am § 6 ch 51 SLA 1990; am §§ 60 — 62 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 39 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 15 SLA 1999; am §§ 19 — 21 ch 81 SLA 2001; am § 18 ch 96 SLA 2004; am § 3 ch 25 SLA 2013)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 3 AAC 23, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, added “, or (8)” at the end of (d)(1), and made a related change.

Sec. 21.27.070.
Scope of examination. [Repealed, § 223 ch 67 SLA 1992.]

Sec. 21.27.080.
Examinations.

The answers of the applicant to an examination shall be written by the applicant under the director’s supervision, and the written examination may be supplemented by oral examination at the director’s discretion.

The director shall give examinations at the times and places that the director considers necessary to reasonably serve the convenience of the director, applicants, and licensees.

The director may require a waiting period of reasonable duration before giving a new examination to an applicant who has failed to pass a previous similar examination.

The director may make arrangements, including contracting with an outside testing service, for administering examinations and collecting a nonrefundable fee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 9 ch 26 SLA 1985; am § 7 ch 51 SLA 1990; am § 63 ch 67 SLA 1992)

Secs. 21.27.090,
21.27.095.
Qualifications for licensing; licensing of general agents. [Repealed, § 223 ch 67 SLA 1992.]

Sec. 21.27.100.
Appointment of insurance producer, managing general agent, and reinsurance intermediary manager; acts of agent.

An appointment is required to be made in accordance with this section when one or more of the following has occurred:

an admitted insurer appoints a managing general agent in this state or relative to a subject resident, located, or to be performed in this state;

a managing general agent appoints an insurance producer as its subagent in this state or relative to subjects resident, located, or to be performed in this state;

a domestic reinsurer appoints a reinsurance intermediary manager;

a reinsurance intermediary manager appoints an insurance producer as its subagent in this state.

An admitted insurer shall appoint an insurance producer as its agent in this state or relative to a subject resident, located, or to be performed in this state not later than 30 days after the date that a written agency contract is executed or the first insurance application is submitted to the admitted insurer by the licensed insurance producer.

An individual who has entered into an employment contract with a licensed firm that is appointed as an agent or a managing general agent on behalf of an admitted insurer under this section may not be required to also have an appointment under this section if the individual has entered into an employment contract with that firm for a specific class of authority.

The authorized or apparently authorized acts on behalf of an appointing insurer of an insurance producer appointed under this section are considered the acts of that insurer.

An insurer and managing general agent shall maintain a current list of all appointments made or required to be made under this section that identifies the licensee’s name, licensee’s mailing address, license number, and effective date of appointment.

An insurance producer shall maintain a list of all appointments made or required to be made under this section that identifies the insurer’s name, insurer’s mailing address, and effective date of appointment.

An insurer, managing general agent, or insurance producer shall reply in writing within three working days to an inquiry of the director regarding an appointment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am §§ 10, 11 ch 51 SLA 1990; am § 64 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 40 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 22 ch 81 SLA 2001; am § 8 ch 1 FSSLA 2005; am § 39 ch 23 SLA 2011)

Sec. 21.27.110.
Term of appointment.

An appointment under AS

21.27.100

continues in force until the appointment is terminated in writing.

If an insurer, reinsurer, or authorized representative discovers information showing that the appointee whose appointment was terminated has engaged in an activity identified in AS

21.27.410

during the period of the appointment, the insurer, reinsurer, or authorized representative shall, on a form or in a format prescribed by the director, promptly notify the director.

Within 15 days after providing notification in accordance with (b) of this section, the insurer, reinsurer, or authorized representative shall mail a copy of the notification to the appointee at the last address on record with the insurer, reinsurer, or authorized representative. The notice must be provided by certified mail, return receipt requested, postage prepaid, or by overnight delivery using a nationally recognized mail carrier.

Within 30 days after the appointee receives notification in accordance with (c) of this section, the appointee may file written comments concerning the substance of the notification with the director and shall provide a copy of the written comments to the insurer, reinsurer, or authorized representative. The written comments filed with the director must be included with each report distributed or disclosed concerning a reason about the termination of the appointment.

If requested by the director, an insurer, a reinsurer, or an authorized representative shall provide to the director additional information, documents, records, or other data pertaining to a termination or activity of a licensee under this title.

A notice of termination submitted to the director under this section must include a statement of the reasons for the termination. A statement of the reasons for termination is confidential and not subject to inspection and copying under AS

40.25.110

. A statement of reasons for the termination may not be admitted as evidence in a civil action or an administrative proceeding against an insurer, reinsurer, or authorized representative by or on behalf of a person affected by the termination, except when the action or proceeding involves perjury, unsworn falsification in the second degree, fraud, or failure to comply with this subsection.

If an insurer, a reinsurer, or an authorized representative fails to report as required under this section or is found by a court to have knowingly or intentionally falsely made that report, the director may, after notice and hearing, suspend or revoke the license or certificate of authority of the insurer, reinsurer, or authorized representative and may impose a penalty in accordance with AS

21.27.440

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 12 ch 51 SLA 1990; am § 65 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 23 ch 81 SLA 2001; am § 9 ch 1 FSSLA 2005; am § 17 ch 42 SLA 2006)

Sec. 21.27.115.
Lines of authority.

If a person has met the applicable requirements of AS

21.27.020

and

21.27.270

, the director shall issue a license for one or more of the following lines of authority:

life insurance coverage on natural persons; in this paragraph, “life insurance coverage”

includes benefits of endowment and annuities; and

may include benefits in the event of death or dismemberment by accident and benefits for disability income;

health insurance coverage for sickness, bodily injury, or accidental death; in this paragraph, “health insurance coverage” may include benefits for disability income;

property insurance coverage for the direct or consequential loss for damage to property of every kind;

casualty insurance coverage against legal liability, including that for death, injury, or disability or damage to real or personal property; in this paragraph, “casualty insurance” includes surety insurance as defined in AS

21.12.080

;

variable life and variable annuity products insurance coverage;

personal lines property and casualty insurance coverage sold to individuals and families for primarily noncommercial purposes;

limited lines credit insurance;

[Repealed, § 66 ch 41 SLA 2016.]

[Repealed, § 66 ch 41 SLA 2016.]

any insurance for which a limited lines license may be issued under AS

21.27.150

.

History.

(§ 24 ch 81 SLA 2001; am § 19 ch 96 SLA 2004; am § 66 ch 41 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective March 1, 2017, repealed (8) and (9).

Sec. 21.27.120.
Revocation of appointment. [Repealed, § 223 ch 67 SLA 1992.]

Sec. 21.27.130.
Form and content of licenses.

A license must be in the form the director prescribes and must set out

the name and address of the licensee and, if the licensee is required to have a place of business, the physical address of the place of business;

the type, class, and lines of authority the licensee is licensed to handle;

the effective date and expiration date of the license;

each condition, if any, under which the license is granted;

the date of issuance of the license;

each fictitious name and alias under which the licensee may do business; and

other information required by the director.

A license issued by the director does not in itself create any authority, actual, apparent, or inherent, in the holder of the license to represent or commit an insurer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 11 ch 29 SLA 1987; am § 14 ch 51 SLA 1990; am § 66 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 41 ch 62 SLA 1995; am §§ 25, 26 ch 81 SLA 2001)

Sec. 21.27.140.
Firm licenses.

A firm shall have a firm license, the scope of which includes all lines and classes of authority of each individual employee of the firm.

A firm may not be licensed as an insurance producer, managing general agent, reinsurance intermediary broker, reinsurance intermediary manager, surplus lines broker, or independent adjuster, or transact insurance unless each individual employed by the firm as an insurance producer, managing general agent, surplus lines broker, trainee independent adjuster, or independent adjuster is licensed and has entered into an employment contract with the firm.

If the director determines under AS

21.06.170

—

21.06.240

that a firm knew or should have known of an act or representation made on the firm’s behalf by a person not licensed as required by this chapter, the firm and the firm’s compliance officer are subject to the penalties provided under AS

21.27.440

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 8 ch 113 SLA 1974; am § 12 ch 29 SLA 1987; am § 67 ch 67 SLA 1992; am §§ 27, 28 ch 81 SLA 2001; am §§ 21, 22 ch 38 SLA 2002; am § 20 ch 96 SLA 2004; am § 8 ch 30 SLA 2009; am § 40 ch 23 SLA 2011)

Administrative Code. —

For fiduciary responsibilities of licensees, see 3 AAC 23, art. 4.

Collateral references. —

Insurer’s tort liability for acts of adjuster seeking to obtain settlement or release. 39 ALR3d 739.